Utah statutes.
17-53-226.   Investigation by legislative body -- Witnesses -- Hearings.
(1)  A county legislative body may investigate any matter pertaining to the
county or its business or affairs or any county officer, and may require the
attendance of witnesses and take evidence in its investigations.
(2)  At such investigations, any member of the county legislative body may
administer oaths to witnesses.
(3)  If the county legislative body appoints a member of its body a committee
upon any subject or matter and confers upon that member power to hear or take
evidence, such committee shall have the same powers in the premises as the
county legislative body itself.
